District of Columbia statutes.
21-2405.03

Transitional provision.

(a)

This chapter applies to guardianship and protective proceedings begun on or after [November 25, 2008].

(b)

Subchapters I, III, and IV [of this chapter] and §§ 21-2405.01 and 21-2405.02 apply to proceedings begun before [November 25, 2008], regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 504 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.